North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131. Public Hospitals. [Repealed]
§§ 131-1 through 131-188.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to health care facilities and services, see now Chapter 131E.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1983, c. 775, s. 3, provides: “Sec. 3. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any unit of government, or units of government acting jointly, that as of December 31, 1983, is operating a hospital or hospitals pursuant to Articles 2 or 2A of Chapter 131 of the General Statutes may continue to operate pursuant to the provisions of those Articles as they existed on December 31, 1983, to the extent that those Articles are inconsistent with this Chapter. However, a unit of government that has been operating a hospital pursuant to those Articles may choose to continue operations under the provisions of one of the Parts of Article 2 of this Chapter by adopting an appropriate resolution and by satisfying all other requirements of the relevant Part of Article 2 of this Chapter.”

Session Laws 1989, c. 283, effective June 12, 1989, amends G.S. 131-7. Session Laws 1989, c. 283, ss. 1 and 2 provide:

“Section 1. G.S. 131-7, as it applies to hospitals continuing to operate under Article 2, Chapter 131 of the North Carolina General Statutes pursuant to Section 3, Chapter 775 of the 1983 Session Laws, is amended by rewriting the first sentence to read: ‘Should a majority of the qualified voters upon the question be in favor of establishing such county, township, or town hospital, the governing body shall proceed at once to appoint seven trustees chosen from the citizens at large with reference to their fitness for such office, all residents of the county, township or town, who shall constitute a board of trustees for such public hospital.’

“Sec. 2. G.S. 131-7 is amended by deleting the phrase ‘No practicing physician may serve as a trustee.’, and substituting ‘One practicing physician may serve as a trustee’.”

Session Laws 1999-377, s. 1, effective August 4, 1999, amends G.S. 131-4 as it applies to hospitals continuing to operate under Article 2, Chapter 131 of the North Carolina General Statutes pursuant to Section 3, Chapter 775 of the 1983 Session Laws, by adding a new subdivision to read:

“(4) Extension of Tax Levy. Prior to or following the expiration of the tax levy specified in subdivision (3) of this section, a new petition may be presented to the governing body of any county in which a township is located, signed by 200 resident freeholders of such township asking that an annual tax continue to be levied for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the public hospital, after the expiration of the tax levy specified in subdivision (3). The procedure for submitting the petition and holding an election on the issue of continuing the tax levy shall be the same as the procedure for the petition and election for establishment of the initial tax levy, provided that the requirement that 150 of the 200 petitioners not be residents of the city, town, or village where the hospital is to be located shall not apply. The tax to be levied under such new election shall not exceed one twenty-fifth of one cent (1/25 of 1 cent) on the dollar ($1.00) for a period of time not exceeding 30 years and shall be for the issue of county or township bonds to provide funds for the maintenance and improvement of the public hospital.”

Session Laws 1999-377, s. 2, amends G.S. 131-5 by adding a sentence providing that the procedure for submission of the issue of continuation of the tax levy is to be the same as set forth previously in G.S. 131-5, so long as the tax is not to exceed one twenty-fifth of one cent on the dollar, and by providing the statement to be used on ballots when the issue is submitted.

Session Laws 1999-377, s. 3, provides that all hospitals which continue to operate under Article 2 of Chapter 131, of the General Statutes pursuant to Section 3 of Chapter 775 of the 1983 Session Laws, shall, in addition to the powers granted in that article have the powers set forth in G.S. 131E-7(a)(1), (3), (5), (6), 131E-7(b), 131E-7(c), 131E-7.1, 131E-11, 131E-23(1), (2), (5), (6), (7), (8), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (23), (24), (25), (26), (27), (28), (30), (31), (32), (33), (34), 131E-26, and 131E-27.

Session Laws 1999-377, s. 4, provides that any hospital continuing to operate under Article 2 of Chapter 131, pursuant to Section 3 of Chapter 775 of the 1983 Session Laws, shall be considered a “public hospital” within the meaning of

G.S. 159-39

and a “unit of local government” within the meaning of

G.S. 160A-20

.

Session Laws 2018-81, s. 2(a), (b), provides: “(a) All hospitals that continue to operate under Article 2 of Chapter 131 of the General Statutes pursuant to Section 3 of Chapter 775 of the 1983 Session Laws may, in addition to the powers and authorities set forth in said Article 2 of Chapter 131 of the General Statutes, exercise each of the powers, authorities, and exemptions set forth in the following provisions of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, singly or in combination:

“(1) G.S. 131E-7(a)(1), (3), (5), and (6).

“(2) G.S. 131E-7(b).

“(3) G.S. 131E-7(c).

“(4) G.S. 131E-7(f).

“(5) G.S. 131E-7.1.

“(6) G.S. 131E-8.

“(7) G.S. 131E-10.

“(8) G.S. 131E-11.

“(9) G.S. 131E-13.

“(10) G.S. 131E-14.1.

“(11) G.S. 131E-23(a)(1) through (38).

“(12) G.S. 131E-23(b).

“(13) G.S. 131E-23(d).

“(14) G.S. 131E-26.

“(15) G.S. 131E-27.

“(16) G.S. 131E-32.

“(17) G.S. 131E-47.1.

“(b) This act amends and adds to the powers and authorities previously conveyed by Section 3 of S.L. 1999-377 to hospitals that continue to operate under Article 2 of Chapter 131 of the General Statutes. This act is not intended to alter or amend the remaining provisions of S.L. 1999-377.”